Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.020

Licensing tax.

The county legislative authority may charge such sum as may be fixed under the authority of RCW 36.32.120(3) for such license, and the person to whom the license is granted shall pay to the appropriate county official the tax for one year in advance.

[ 1985 c 91 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.020. Prior: Code 1881 s 3003; 1879 p 61 s 39; 1869 p 280 s 41; 1863 p 522 s 2; 1854 p 354 s 2; RRS s 5463.]